District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Ticket Amnesty Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Ticket Amnesty Program
(a) The Mayor shall establish an amnesty program for any person who is liable for:
(1) A delinquent notice of infraction for a parking, standing or stopping infraction
issued pursuant to Title III of the District of Columbia Traffic Adjudication Act of 1978,
effective September 12, 1978 (D.C. Law 2-104; D.C. Official Code § 50-2303.01 et seq.); or
(2) A delinquent notice of infraction for an automated traffic enforcement
violation issued pursuant to section 902 of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Act of 1996,
effective April 9, 1997 (D.C. Law 11-198; D.C. Official Code § 50-2209.02).

(b) The amnesty program shall be administered by the Director of the Department of
Motor Vehicles.
(c) The amnesty program shall be available for at least six consecutive months and begin
no more than sixty days from the date of approval of this Act.
(d) While the amnesty program is available, the Director of the Department of Motor
Vehicles shall publicize the terms and conditions of the amnesty program.
(e) A person who is eligible to participate in the amnesty program pursuant to subsection
(a) of this section may participate in the amnesty program by paying the amount of the original
notice of infraction online, in person or by mail.
(f) Upon successful payment of the original notice of infraction, the penalties for such
paid notices will be waived and the infraction closed.
(g) Revenue received from the amnesty program shall be credited to the General Fund of
the District of Columbia as established by Section 47-131 of the District of Columbia Official
Code.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review


as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).